Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 20.3
COMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY

23-20.3-101 to 23-20.3-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article repealed, p. 18, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1999 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2000. For the text of this article prior to 2000, consult the 1999 Colorado Revised Statutes.